Tennessee, session 114, SB1710.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-1-1002(a), is amended by
deleting "healthy school environment, school counseling" and substituting "healthy school
environment, child trafficking prevention and awareness education, school counseling".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-1304, is amended by deleting
subdivision (a)(13)(B), and by deleting the second sentence in subsection (d).
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 6, Part 10, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) As used in this section, "child trafficking" means a human trafficking offense,
as defined in § 39-13-314, in which the victim is less than eighteen (18) years of age.
(b) The course of instruction in all public schools must include child trafficking
prevention and awareness education as a component of health education for students in
all grades kindergarten through grade twelve (K-12).
(c) Using the health education standards adopted by the state board of
education, an LEA and public charter school shall ensure that the instruction provided
pursuant to subsection (b) is age- and grade-appropriate and advances each year
through developmentally appropriate instruction and skill building.
(d) An LEA and public charter school may utilize the services of a qualified
healthcare professional or social worker to assist in teaching child trafficking prevention
and awareness; provided, that the qualified healthcare professional or social worker
meets the requirements for assisting in teaching family life under § 49-6-1303.
SB1710
010801
- 1 -

(e) By August 1, 2026, and each August 1 thereafter, each local board of
education and public charter school governing body must submit a plan to implement the
requirements of this section to the commissioner of education and publish the plan on
the website for the LEA or public charter school. The implementation plan must include:
(1) The methods by which instruction will be delivered for each grade
level served by the LEA or public charter school;
(2) The professional qualifications of the person delivering the instruction;
and
(3) A description of the materials and resources used to deliver the
instruction.
(f) By July 1, 2027, and each July 1 thereafter, each local board of education
and public charter school governing body must submit a report to the commissioner of
education concerning implementation of this section. The report must verify that the
LEA or public charter school provided the instruction required in this section during the
immediately preceding school year and include the information described in subdivisions
(e)(1)-(3).
SECTION 4. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it,
and applies to the 2026-2027 school year and subsequent school years.
- 2 - 010801